Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 2 Childhood Lead Exposure Control

31-41-10.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Childhood Lead Exposure Control Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-41-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1260, § 1.

31-41-11.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that childhood lead poisoning prevention activities are currently carried out within the Environmental Health, Epidemiology, and Laboratory sections of the Department of Public Health. These activities include lead poisoning case identification, laboratory support, identification of exposure sources, environmental management, and lead hazard reduction. Childhood lead poisoning cases are identified through screening tests conducted by public health clinics and private health care providers and by laboratory reporting of test results. In 1994, lead poisoning was established as a notifiable condition and made part of the Notifiable Disease reporting system.

The General Assembly further finds that the Georgia Public Health Laboratory is licensed and certified to analyze blood specimens for lead. Laboratory services are provided for children screened in public health clinics and for children without health insurance screened by private health care providers. For each reported case of lead poisoning, an environmental investigation is conducted to identify the source of lead. Environmental health specialists assess the primary residence and other locations frequented by the lead poisoned child. Information is collected from parents and caregivers; on-site surface testing and environmental sample collection and analysis are done as needed. When the lead source is identified, recommendations are made for the mitigation or abatement of the lead hazard. Identified lead poisoning cases are tracked collaboratively by public health nurses and environmental health specialists to assure that appropriate treatment is received and that the child does not reenter the environment where the exposure occurred.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-41-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1260, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-2/HB 214; Ga. L. 2022, p. 320, § 2/HB 1355.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “Environmental Health, Epidemiology, and Laboratory sections” for “Environmental Health and Injury Prevention, Epidemiology and Prevention, and Laboratory Branches” in the first sentence in subsection (a).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “lead poisoned child” was substituted for “lead-poisoned child” at the end of the fourth sentence in subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-41-12.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Confirmed lead poisoning” means a confirmed concentration of lead equal to or greater than 3.5 micrograms of lead per deciliter using a single venous blood test or two capillary blood tests taken within 12 weeks of each other.

“Day-care facility” means a structure or structures used as a school, nursery, child care center, clinic, treatment center, or other facility serving the needs of children under six years of age including the grounds, any outbuildings, or other structures appurtenant to the facility.

“Department” means the Department of Public Health.

“Dwelling,” “dwelling unit,” or “residential housing unit” means the interior or exterior of a structure, all or part of which is designed or used for human habitation.

“Elevated blood lead level” means a blood lead concentration of 3.5 micrograms per deciliter or greater in any test.

(5.1)

“Lead hazard abatement” means the removal and correction, in a manner no more strict than what is determined to be absolutely necessary, of a specifically identified hazard which causes a confirmed lead poisoning.

“Lead poisoning hazard” means the presence of readily accessible or mouthable lead-bearing substances measuring 1.0 milligram per square centimeter or greater by X-ray fluorescence or 0.5 percent or greater by chemical analysis; 10 micrograms per square foot or greater for dust on floors; 100 micrograms per square foot or greater for dust on window sills; or 400 parts per million in bare soil in outdoor areas of a dwelling, dwelling unit, school, or day-care facility used by children as play areas or an average of 1,200 parts per million in bare soil in other outdoor areas of the dwelling, dwelling unit, school, or day-care facility not used for children’s play.

“Lead safe housing” is housing that was built since 1978 or that has been tested by a person who has been licensed or certified by the Board of Natural Resources to perform such testing and either found to have no lead-based paint hazards within the meaning of Title X of the Residential Lead-Based Paint Hazard Reduction Act of 1992, 14 U.S.C. Code Section 185(b)(15) or housing that has been found to meet the requirements of the maintenance standard.

“Maintenance standard” means the following:

Repairing and repainting areas of deteriorated paint inside a residential housing unit;

Cleaning the interior of the unit to a standard of cleaning which is at least customary in the local area at lease origination or as part of the abatement plan, whichever is first, to remove dust that constitutes a lead poisoning hazard;

Adjusting doors and windows to minimize friction or impact on surfaces;

Subject to the occupant’s approval, appropriately cleaning any carpets at lease origination or as part of the abatement plan, whichever is first;

Taking such steps as are necessary to ensure that all interior surfaces on which dust might collect are readily cleanable; and

Providing the occupant or occupants all information required to be provided under the Residential Lead-Based Paint Hazard Reduction Act of 1992 and amendments thereto.

“Managing agent” means any person who has charge, care, or control of a building or part thereof in which dwelling units or rooming units are leased.

“Mouthable lead-bearing substance” means any substance on surfaces or fixtures five feet or less from the floor or ground that form a protruding corner or similar edge, protrude one-half inch or more from a flat wall surface, or are freestanding and contain lead contaminated dust at a level that constitutes a lead poisoning hazard. Mouthable surfaces or fixtures include vinyl miniblinds, doors, door jambs, stairs, stair rails, windows, window sills, and baseboards.

“Readily accessible lead-bearing substance” means any substance containing lead at a level that constitutes a lead poisoning hazard which can be ingested or inhaled by a child under six years of age. Readily accessible substances include deteriorated paint that is peeling, chipping, cracking, flaking, or blistering to the extent that the paint has separated from the substrate. Readily accessible substances also include paint that is chalking.

“Regularly visits” means presence at a dwelling, dwelling unit, school, or day-care facility for at least two days a week for more than three hours per day.

“Supplemental address” means a dwelling, dwelling unit, school, or day-care facility where a child with an elevated blood lead level or a confirmed lead poisoning regularly visits or attends. Supplemental address also means a dwelling, school, or day-care facility where a child resided, regularly visited, or attended within the six months immediately preceding the determination of an elevated blood lead level or a confirmed lead poisoning.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-41-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1260, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 822, § 1/HB 1043; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-18/HB 214; Ga. L. 2022, p. 320, § 3/HB 1355.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote paragraph (1), which read: “‘Confirmed lead poisoning’ means a confirmed concentration of lead in whole blood equal to or greater than 20 micrograms of lead per deciliter for a single test or between 15 and 19 micrograms of lead per deciliter in two tests taken at least three months apart.”; inserted “or exterior” in paragraph (4); in paragraph (5), substituted “3.5” for “ten” and “in any test” for “as determined by the lower of two consecutive blood tests within a six-month period”; rewrote paragraph (6), which read: “‘Lead poisoning hazard’ means the presence of readily accessible or mouthable lead-bearing substances measuring 1.0 milligram per square centimeter or greater by X-ray fluorescence or 0.5 percent or greater by chemical analysis; 100 micrograms per square foot or greater for dust on floors; 500 micrograms per square foot or greater for dust on window sills.”; deleted former paragraph (11), which read: “‘Persistent elevated blood lead level’ means a blood lead concentration of 15 to 19 micrograms per deciliter as determined by the lowest of three consecutive blood tests. The first two blood tests shall be performed within a six-month period, and the third blood test shall be performed at least 12 weeks and not more than six months after the second blood test.”; redesignated former paragraphs (12) through (14) as present paragraphs (11) through (13), respectively; and, substituted “an elevated” for “a persistent elevated” twice in paragraph (13).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “lead-bearing substances” was substituted for “lead bearing substances” in paragraph (6).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-41-13.
Notice of lead poisoning hazard.

Upon determination that a lead poisoning hazard exists, the department shall give written notice of the lead poisoning hazard to the owner of the dwelling, dwelling unit, school, or day-care facility and to all persons residing in or attending the dwelling or facility. The department shall also make every reasonable and practicable effort to provide written notice to the managing agent of the dwelling, dwelling unit, school, or day-care facility. The written notice to the owner, managing agent, or tenant shall include a list of possible methods of abatement of the lead poisoning hazard.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-41-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1260, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 822, § 2/HB 1043; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-6/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-41-14.
Abatement of lead poisoning hazard.

Upon determination that a child less than six years of age has a confirmed lead poisoning and that the child resides in, attends, or regularly visits a dwelling, dwelling unit, school, or day-care facility containing lead poisoning hazards, the department shall require a lead hazard abatement. The department shall also require a lead hazard abatement at the supplemental addresses of a child less than six years of age with a confirmed lead poisoning. Upon confirming that all other potential sources of the confirmed lead poisoning have tested negative and making every reasonable effort to obtain consent from such dwelling’s owner or managing agent to comply with this Code section, the department shall solicit a court order from the superior court with jurisdiction over such dwelling to order the dwelling’s owner to perform a lead hazard abatement.

When abatement is required under subsection (a) of this Code section, the owner or managing agent shall submit a written lead poisoning hazard abatement plan to the department within 30 days of receipt of the lead poisoning hazard notification and shall obtain written approval of the plan prior to initiating abatement. The lead poisoning hazard abatement plan shall comply with subsection (g) of this Code section. The written plan shall be deemed approved if the department does not respond within 30 days of receipt.

If the abatement plan submitted fails to meet the requirements of this Code section, the department shall issue an abatement order requiring submission of a modified abatement plan. The order shall indicate the modifications which shall be made to the abatement plan and the date by which the plan as modified shall be submitted to the department.

If the owner or managing agent does not submit an abatement plan within 30 days, the department shall issue an abatement order requiring submission of an abatement plan within five days of receipt of the order.

The owner or managing agent shall notify the department and the occupants of the dates of abatement activities at least three days prior to the commencement of abatement activities.

Abatement shall be completed within 60 days of the department’s approval of the abatement plan. If the abatement activities are not completed within 60 days as required, the department shall issue an order requiring completion of abatement activities. An owner or managing agent may apply to the department for an extension of the deadline for abatement. The department may issue an order extending the deadline for 30 days upon proper written application by the owner or managing agent.

All lead-containing waste and residue of the abatement of lead shall be removed and disposed of by the person performing the abatement in accordance with applicable federal, state, and local laws and rules.

The department shall verify by clearance inspection that the approved abatement plan has been completed. The department may also require residual lead dust monitoring.

Removal or exclusion of children from the dwelling, school, or day-care facility shall not constitute abatement if the property continues to be used as a dwelling, school, or day-care facility. If the property will not be used as a dwelling, school, or day-care facility, the property owner shall submit a notarized document to the department certifying that the structure or structures will no longer be used as a dwelling, school, or day-care facility.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-41-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1260, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 822, § 3/HB 1043; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-6/HB 214; Ga. L. 2022, p. 320, § 4/HB 1355.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “30 days” for “14 days” twice in subsection (b) and in subsection (d); rewrote subsection (h), which read: “The department shall verify by visual inspection that the approved abatement plan has been completed. The department may also verify plan completion by residual lead dust monitoring. Compliance with the maintenance standard shall be deemed equivalent to meeting the abatement plan requirements.”; and, in subsection (i), in the first sentence, inserted “or exclusion” and substituted “used as” for “used for”, and added the second sentence.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-41-15.
Owner liability for units constructed prior to 1978.

Any owner of a residential housing unit constructed prior to 1978 who is sued by a current or former occupant seeking damages for injuries allegedly arising from exposure to lead-based paint or lead-contaminated dust shall not be deemed liable: (1) for any injuries sustained by that occupant after the owner first complied with the maintenance standard defined under paragraph (8) of Code Section 31-41-12, provided that the owner has repeated the steps provided for in the maintenance standard annually and obtained a certificate of compliance under Code Section 31-41-16 annually during such occupancy; or (2) if the owner is able to show that the unit was lead safe housing containing no lead-based paint hazards during the period when the injuries were sustained. Nothing contained in this article shall be construed or interpreted as imposing or creating any liability on or creating any cause of action against any owner or managing agent of a dwelling, dwelling unit, or residential housing unit arising from exposure to lead-based paint or lead-contaminated dust, regardless of when such dwelling, dwelling unit, or residential housing unit was constructed and regardless of whether the requirements of this article have been complied with or accomplished.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-41-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1260, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, a comma was inserted following “Code Section 31-41-12” in the first sentence.

31-41-16.
Certificate evidencing compliance; liability relief.

An owner of a unit who has complied with the maintenance standard may apply annually to the department for, and upon presentation of acceptable proof of compliance shall be provided by the department a certificate evidencing such compliance. The owner shall be entitled to the liability relief provided for in Code Section 31-41-15 upon obtaining such certificate or certificates.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-41-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1260, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-6/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-41-17.
Advice regarding cleaning activities.

In any residential housing unit, day-care facility, or school occupied by a child less than six years old who has an elevated blood lead level, the department shall advise, in writing, the owner or managing agent and the child’s parents or legal guardian as to the importance of carrying out routine cleaning activities in the units they occupy, own, or manage. Such cleaning activities shall include:

Wiping clean all window sills with a damp cloth or sponge at least weekly;

Regularly washing all surfaces accessible to the child;

In the case of a leased residential housing unit, identifying any deteriorated paint in the unit and notifying the owner or managing agent of such conditions within 72 hours of discovery; and

Identifying and understanding potential lead poisoning hazards in the environment of each child under the age of six in the housing unit, including vinyl miniblinds, playground equipment, soil, and painted surfaces, and taking steps to prevent the child from ingesting lead, such as encouraging the child to wash his or her face and hands frequently and especially after playing outdoors.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-41-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1260, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-6/HB 214; Ga. L. 2022, p. 320, § 5/HB 1355.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence of the introductory language, inserted “, day care facility, or school” near the beginning, and deleted “of ten micrograms per deciliter or greater” following “level”; and inserted a comma following “surfaces” in paragraph (4).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-41-18.
Application.

This article shall only apply to:

Owners of residential rental property that accept compensation for the use of residential property by another;

Landlords that accept compensation for the use of residential property by another;

Day-care facilities; and

Schools.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-41-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1260, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 822, § 3/HB 1043; Ga. L. 2022, p. 320, § 6/HB 1355.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote this Code section, which read: “This article shall only apply to:

“(1) Owners of residential rental property; and

“(2) Landlords

“that accept compensation for the use of residential property by another.”.

31-41-19.
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Public Health shall be authorized to promulgate all necessary regulations for the implementation and enforcement of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-41-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1260, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-2/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).